Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 396.165 is amended to read:
396.165. (1) The Adjutant General may  appoint [ three] four Assistant Adjutants General, two
from the Army National Guard  of Oregon and [ one] two from the Air National Guard of Oregon
who shall serve at the pleasure of the Adjutant General or  until relieved by reason of resignation,
withdrawal of federal recognition or for cause to be determined by  a court-martial. Voluntary entry
onto extended active duty by a person holding  the office of Assistant Adjutant General shall be
deemed automatic resignation of such officer.
(2) To be eligible for appointment to the office of Assistant Adjutant General,  a person must be
an officer of the Oregon National Guard, federally  recognized in the grade of lieutenant colonel or
higher, and must have completed at least six years service  in the Oregon National Guard as a
federally recognized officer.
(3) An Assistant Adjutant General may be appointed in the grade of lieutenant colonel or higher,
but not  exceeding that of brigadier general. An Assistant Adjutant General may be promoted by the
Governor to any grade  not exceeding that of brigadier general, to serve in such grade only upon
receipt of federal recognition therein.
(4) The Assistant Adjutants General shall perform such duties as may be assigned  by the Adju-
tant General.
(5) An Assistant Adjutant General shall be compensated at a rate determined by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) In any absence of the Adjutant General caused by death or other inability to  perform the
duties of the office, the Governor or the Adjutant General may designate  an Assistant Adjutant
General to be the Acting Adjutant General. Except when the  Governor or the Adjutant General
designates another of the Assistant Adjutants General to  be the Acting Adjutant General, the As-
sistant Adjutant General senior in military grade shall assume the responsibilities and powers and
perform all the duties required of the Adjutant General, and shall be  Acting Adjutant General. An
officer serving as Acting Adjutant  General under this section shall continue to receive the salary
authorized for an Assistant Adjutant General, when the officer is a state employee, but shall  oth-
erwise receive the salary authorized for  the Adjutant General. The Acting Adjutant General shall
serve until the Adjutant General is again able to perform the duties of the office, or if such  office
is vacant, until  an Adjutant General is regularly appointed and qualified. [ While so serving, ] Within
Enrolled Senate Bill 801 (SB 801-INTRO) Page 1
30 days after assuming the duties of the office,  the Acting Adjutant General shall give to the
state a fidelity bond in the same  manner and in the same sum as is required from the Adjutant
General.
Passed by Senate February 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 801 (SB 801-INTRO) Page 2